Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1208.01
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any: Individual; partnership; limited liability company; association; public or private corporation; trustee; receiver; assignee; agent; municipality or other governmental subdivision; public agency; other legal entity; or any officer or governing or managing body of any public or private corporation, municipality, governmental subdivision, public agency, or other legal entity.

Laws 1996, LB 1241, § 4.